Missouri, session 2026, SB834.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
1
Section A. Chapters 442 and 443, RSMo, are amended by
2
adding thereto seven new sections, to be known as sections
3
442.920, 443.920, 443.921, 443.922, 443.923, 443.924, and
4
443.925, to read as follows:
1
442.920. 1. This section shall be known and may be
2
cited as the " Mis s ouri Residential Sale Leaseback Protection
3
Act".
4
2. For purposes of this section, the following terms
5
mean:
6
(1) "Buyer", any person or entity that acquires an
7
ownershi p interest in residential real estate in a sale
8
leaseback transaction;
9
(2) "Residential real estate", real property that is
10
improved by a building or other structure that has one to
11
four dwelling units;
12
(3) "Sale leaseback", a transaction or series of
13
transact i ons in which a seller sells residential real estate
14
that is or was the seller's residence to another party and,
15
as a condition of the sale, or as part of the same or a

SS SB 834 2
16
related transaction, enters into a lease or rental agreement
17
to remain in or re-occupy the property;
18
(4) "Seller", any natural person who transfers an
19
ownershi p interest in residential real estate in a sale
20
leaseback transaction.
21
3. (1) In any sale leaseback transaction, the buyer
22
shall p r ovid e the seller with the following disclosure on a
23
single page in a clear and conspicuous manner, printed in
24
boldface type:
25
If you sign a sale leaseback agreement, you
26
are entering into a contract to sell your
27
home. This means you will no longer own your
28
home.
29
You may be subject to eviction if you do not
30
follow the lease terms.
31
You may lose the right to buy back your home.
32
This may affect your credit, taxes, and legal
33
rights.
34
You are encouraged to speak with:
35
(1) An attorney;
36
(2) A real estate agent;
37
(3) A housing counselor;
38
(4) A tax advisor; and
39
(5) A real estate appraiser.
40
No sale leaseback can be closed for at least
41
thirty (30) days after signing an agreement.
42
Do not sign unless you fully understand the
43
terms.

SS SB 834 3
44
(2) The disclosure required by subdivision (1) of this
45
subsecti o n shall be provided to the seller not less than
46
fourteen calendar days prior to execution of any sale
47
leaseback agreement, and the disclosures shall be signed by
48
both the seller and the buyer concurrently with the
49
execution of the sale leaseback agreement.
50
(3) A copy of the signed disclosure required by
51
subdivis i on (1) of this subsection shall be provided to the
52
seller within five days of the execution of the sale
53
leaseback agreement.
54
4. There shall be no delivery, recording, or other
55
transfe r of title from seller to buyer until thirty days
56
after the execution of any sale leaseback agreement.
57
5. (1) Any violation of the provisions of this
58
section shal l be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed
59
ten thousand dollars per violation.
60
(2) The attorney general may bring an action to
61
enforce t his section, including actions for injunctive
62
relief, civil penalties, and restitution.
63
(3) Any seller harmed by a violation of this section
64
may brin g a civil action to recover:
65
(a) Actual damages;
66
(b) Statutory damages of ten thousand dollars, which
67
shall be in addition to any actual damages proven;
68
(c) Attorneys' fees and costs; and
69
(d) Equitable or injunctive relief.
70
6. N o provision of this section shall be modified or
71
waived b y any agreement. Any portion of an agreement that
72
is executed, modified, or extended after the effective date
73
of this section that modifies or waives a duty or remedy
74
under this section is void ab initio and unenforceable.

SS SB 834 4
1
443.920. Sections 443.920 to 443.925 shall be known
2
and may be ci t ed as the "Uniform Mortgage Modification Act".
1
443.921. For purposes of sections 443.920 to 443.925,
2
the following terms mean:
3
(1) "Electronic", relating to technology having
4
electric a l, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical,
5
electromagnetic, or similar capabilities;
6
(2) "Financial covenant", an undertaking to
7
demonstr a te an obligor's creditworthiness, or the adequacy
8
of security provided by an obligor;
9
(3) "Modification", includes any change, amendment,
10
revision , correction, addition, supplementation,
11
elimination, waiver, and restatement;
12
(4) "Mortgage":
13
(a) An agreement that creates a consensual interest in
14
real pro p erty to secure payment or performance of an
15
obligation, regardless of:
16
a. How the agreement is denominated, including a
17
mortgag e , deed of trust, trust deed, security deed,
18
indenture, and deed to secure debt; and
19
b. Whether the agreement also creates a security
20
interes t in personal property; and
21
(b) Does not include an agreement that creates a
22
consensu a l interest to secure a liability owed by a unit
23
owner to a condominium association, owners' association, or
24
cooperative housing association for association dues, fees,
25
or assessments;
26
(5) "Mortgage modification", modification of:
27
(a) A mortgage;
28
(b) An agreement that creates an obligation, including
29
a promis s ory note, loan agreement, or credit agreement; or

SS SB 834 5
30
(c) An agreement that creates other security or credit
31
enhancem e nt for an obligation, including an assignment of
32
leases or rents or a guaranty;
33
(6) "Obligation", a debt, duty, or other liability,
34
secured b y a mortgage;
35
(7) "Obligor", a person that:
36
(a) Owes payment or performance of an obligation;
37
(b) Signs a mortgage; or
38
(c) Is otherwise accountable, or whose property serves
39
as colla t eral, for payment or performance of an obligation;
40
(8) "Person", an individual, estate, business or
41
nonprofi t entity, government or governmental subdivision,
42
agency, or instrumentality, or other legal entity;
43
(9) "Recognized index", an index to which changes in
44
the inte r est rate may be linked that is:
45
(a) Readily available to, and verifiable by, the
46
obligor; and
47
(b) Beyond the control of the person to whom the
48
obligati o n is owed;
49
(10) "Record", used as a noun, means information:
50
(a) I nscribed on a tangible medium; or
51
(b) Stored in an electronic or other medium and
52
retrieva b le in perceivable form;
53
(11) "Sign", with present intent to authenticate or
54
adopt a r e cord:
55
(a) Execute or adopt a tangible symbol; or
56
(b) Attach to or logically associate with the record
57
an elect r onic symbol, sound, or process.
1
443.922. 1. Except as provided in subsection 3 of
2
this section, sec t ions 443.920 to 443.925 apply to a
3
mortgage modification.
4
2. Sections 443.920 to 443.925 do not affect:

SS SB 834 6
5
(1) Laws governing the required content of a mortgage;
6
(2) A statute of limitations or other law governing
7
the expi r ation or termination of a right to enforce an
8
obligation or a mortgage;
9
(3) A recording statute;
10
(4) A statute governing the priority of a tax lien or
11
other go v ernmental lien;
12
(5) A statute of frauds; or
13
(6) Except as provided in subdivision (8) of
14
subsecti o n 2 of section 443.923, law governing the priority
15
of a future advance.
16
3. Sections 443.920 to 443.925 do not apply to any of
17
the fol l owing modifications:
18
(1) A release of, or addition to, property encumbered
19
by a mor t gage;
20
(2) A release of, addition of, or other change in an
21
obligor; or
22
(3) An assignment or other transfer of a mortgage or
23
an oblig a tion.
1
443.923. 1. For a mortgage modification described in
2
subsection 2 o f t h is section:
3
(1) The mortgage continues to secure the obligation as
4
modified ;
5
(2) The priority of the mortgage is not affected by
6
the modi f ication;
7
(3) The mortgage retains its priority regardless of
8
whether a record of the mortgage modification is recorded in
9
the public land records; and
10
(4) The modification is not a novation.
11
2. S ubsection 1 of this section applies to one or more
12
of the f ollowing mortgage modifications:
13
(1) An extension of the maturity date of an obligation;

SS SB 834 7
14
(2) A decrease in the interest rate of an obligation;
15
(3) If the change does not result in an increase in
16
the inte r est rate of an obligation as calculated on the date
17
the modification becomes effective:
18
(a) A change to a different index that is a recognized
19
index if the previous index to which changes in the interest
20
rate were linked is no longer available;
21
(b) A change in the differential between the index and
22
the inte r est rate;
23
(c) A change from a floating or adjustable rate to a
24
fixed ra t e; or
25
(d) A change from a fixed rate to a floating or
26
adjustab l e rate based on a recognized index;
27
(4) A capitalization of unpaid interest or other
28
unpaid m o netary obligation;
29
(5) A forgiveness, forbearance, or other reduction of
30
principa l , accrued interest, or other monetary obligation;
31
(6) A modification of a requirement for maintaining an
32
escrow o r reserve account for payment of an obligation,
33
including taxes and insurance premiums;
34
(7) A modification of a requirement for acquiring or
35
maintain i ng insurance;
36
(8) A modification of an existing condition to advance
37
funds;
38
(9) A modification of a financial covenant; and
39
(10 ) A modification of the payment amount or schedule
40
resulting from another modification described in this
41
subsection.
42
3. The effect of a mortgage modification not described
43
in subs e ction 2 of this section is governed by other law.
1
443.924. Pursuant to the authority granted by the
2
federal Elect r onic Signatures in Global and National

SS SB 834 8
3
Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. Section 7002, sections 443.920 to
4
443.925 modify, limit, or supersede such act, 15 U.S.C.
5
Section 7001, et seq., as amended, but do not modify, limit,
6
or supersede 15 U.S.C. Section 7001(c), or authorize
7
electronic delivery of any of the notices described in 15
8
U.S.C. Section 7003(b).
1
443.925. Sections 443.920 to 443.925 apply to a
2
mortgage modi f ication made on or after the effective date of
3
such sections regardless of when the mortgage or the
4
obligation was created.
1
Section B. If any provision of section A of this act
2
or the applicat i on thereof to anyone or to any circumstance
3
is held invalid, the remainder of those sections and the
4
application of such provisions to others or other
5
circumstances shall not be affected thereby.
